Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 21 Replevin

34-21-1.
Property repleviable on superior court writ.

Whenever any goods or chattels of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) value shall be unlawfully taken or unlawfully detained from the owner or from the person entitled to the possession thereof, and whenever any goods or chattels of that value, which are attached on mesne process or execution or warrant of distress, are claimed by any person other than the defendant in the suit or process in which they are attached, the owner or other person may cause the same to be replevied by writ of replevin issuing from the superior court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 1; C. P. A. 1905, §§ 1216, 1235; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 39.

34-21-2.
District court jurisdiction.

The district court may issue writs of replevin where the goods and chattels to be replevied are valued at five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, and venue of the action may be in any division of the district court where they were taken, attached or detained. The court may also try the same and award execution therein, adhering in its proceedings, as near as may be, to the forms herein prescribed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 12; C.P.A. 1905, § 1235; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 12; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 39.

Forms.

The word “forms” in this section refers to the forms of procedure used in replevin suits, which may be followed by district courts within the limits of their jurisdiction. Angell v. Sprague,

35 R.I. 156

, 85 A. 790,

1913 R.I. LEXIS 8

(1913).

34-21-3.
Service of writ where deputy is party.

If any deputy sheriff is a party to the suit, then the writ shall be directed to and served by either of the town sergeants or constables in the county in which the same is to be served.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-3

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 67.

34-21-4.
Bond given prior to service of writ.

The officer charged with the service of any such writ shall, before serving the same, take from the plaintiff, or from someone in his or her behalf, a bond to the defendant, with sufficient sureties, or a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in double the value of the goods and chattels to be replevied, with condition to prosecute the writ of replevin to final judgment and to pay such damages and costs as the defendant in the writ shall recover against the plaintiff, and also to return and restore the same goods and chattels in like good order and condition as when taken, in case such shall be the final judgment on the writ.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 3; P.L. 1901, ch. 815, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 937, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-4

.

34-21-5.
Court examination of bond — Failure of plaintiff to comply with court order.

The officer taking any goods or chattels by virtue of a writ of replevin shall not surrender or deliver the writ to the plaintiff until the amount of the plaintiff’s bond and the sufficiency of the surety shall have been approved by the court to which the writ is returnable. Every officer who shall have served the writ shall make return thereof with his or her doings thereon as soon thereafter as possible to the clerk of the court to which the writ is returnable, and the cause shall then be in order for summary hearing upon the size of the plaintiff’s bond and the sufficiency of his or her surety. The court after notice and hearing shall fix the amount of the plaintiff’s bond and determine the sufficiency of the surety and shall enter its order accordingly. If the plaintiff fails to comply with the order within three (3) days from the entry thereof, the court shall forthwith and without hearing direct the officer in possession of the goods and chattels to return them immediately to the defendant. Thereafter, upon the defendant’s motion, decision shall be for the defendant for his or her damages and costs. Failure of the plaintiff to comply with the order of the court shall also operate as an adjudication of the title to the goods and chattels replevied in favor of the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 937, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-5

.

34-21-6.
Insufficient bond.

In case the defendant shall at any time pending the writ of replevin be dissatisfied with the amount of the sureties or the surety company in the bond, the court before which the writ is pending may, on the defendant’s motion and for cause shown, in its discretion order the plaintiff to give further bond or further surety; and if the plaintiff does not comply with such order, the plaintiff’s action shall be dismissed and judgment shall be rendered for the defendant, for a return and restoration of the goods and chattels replevied and for damages and costs, the same as if the plaintiff had neglected to enter the writ of replevin.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 4; P.L. 1901, ch. 815, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-6

.

34-21-7.
Failure of plaintiff to prosecute.

Whenever any plaintiff in replevin shall neglect to enter and prosecute the suit, the defendant may, upon complaint, have judgment for a return and restoration of the goods and chattels replevied, and reasonable damages for the taking, with such reasonable costs as shall be adjudged by the court, and a writ of return and restoration thereupon accordingly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-7

.

34-21-8.
Judgment for defendant.

If, upon trial of the writ of replevin, judgment is rendered for a return and restoration, the defendant shall recover his or her reasonable damages with costs of suit.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-8

.

34-21-9.
Form of writ of return and restoration.

The writ of return and restoration shall be substantially as follows:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. (SEAL) To the sheriffs and certified constables of our several counties, or to their deputies, Greeting: Whereas
of in the county of
lately replevied the following goods and chattels, viz.: (here enumerate and particularly describe them) which
in our county of had unlawfully taken (detained, or attached, as the case may be) as suggested, and caused to be summoned to appear before our superior court to be held at to answer unto for such unlawful taking (detaining, or attaching, as the case may be) on the day of . And whereas, to our said court at its session held as aforesaid, upon a full hearing of the cause of the taking (detaining, or attaching, as the case may be) it appeared that the taking (detaining, or attaching, as the case may be) was lawful and justifiable, whereupon it was then and there by the court considered that the same be returned and restored unto irrepleviable, and that recover against the sum of dollars damages, for his or her taking the same by the process of replevin and his or her costs of defense taxed at as to us appears of record, whereof execution remains to be done: we command you, therefore, that you forthwith return and restore the same goods and chattels unto and also that of the goods and chattels and real estate of within your precinct, you cause to be levied and paid unto the aforesaid sums, being in the whole together with your fees; and for want of such goods and chattels or real estate of to be by you found within your precinct, to satisfy and pay the sums aforesaid, we command you to take the body of and commit him or her to our correctional institution in your precinct, therein to be kept until he or she pays the sums aforementioned, with your fees, or until he or she is discharged by or otherwise by order of law. Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ and your doings thereon, to our superior court on or before the day of . Witness, the seal of our superior court at this day of in the year . , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 11; C.P.A. 1905, § 1169; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-9

; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 35; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 35.

34-21-10.
Recovery of damages and costs by plaintiff.

If, upon trial of the writ of replevin, the plaintiff shall make good his or her plea, the plaintiff shall recover from the defendant reasonable damages for the taking and detention of the goods and chattels, and costs; provided, that no costs shall be taxed against a defendant bailee where such bailee upon demand surrenders the replevied property to the officer serving the writ and makes no defense to the action, if the bailee shall, before service of the writ, have offered to surrender the property upon receipt of a good and sufficient bond of indemnity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 7; P.L. 1901, ch. 847, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-10

.

34-21-11.
Damages and costs on divided judgment.

If, upon trial of the writ of replevin, the plaintiff shall make good his or her plea for part of the goods replevied, and shall fail to make it good as to the other part, the plaintiff shall have judgment for reasonable damages for the taking and detention of the part adjudged to be plaintiff’s, and costs, and the defendant shall have judgment for a return and restoration of the goods and chattels adjudged to defendant, with damages, as provided in §

34-21-10

, according to the relative value of such part, and with or without costs at the discretion of the court, but the court shall, in such case, set off the damages recovered by each.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-11

.

34-21-12.
Restored property subject to prior attachment.

Whenever the goods and chattels replevied shall have been taken on execution or warrant of distress, they shall, in case of a judgment of return and restoration, be held responsible for the space of twenty (20) days after the return thereof; if on mesne process, until thirty (30) days shall have expired after final judgment thereon, in case judgment shall not then have been given, but if final judgment on mesne process shall have been given before the return, then for the space of twenty (20) days only after the return, to the end that the creditor, at whose suit they were originally taken, may have a complete remedy, and the benefit of his or her attachment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-12

.

34-21-13.
Assumption of defense by attaching creditor.

Whenever any action of replevin shall be brought against an officer who has taken or attached goods and chattels at the suit of a creditor, the creditor shall have the right to assume the defense of the suit upon indemnifying the officer against damages and costs therein, and the money recovered by way of damages by the officer shall be deemed to be recovered to the use of the attaching creditor, and when received shall be paid over to the creditor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 272, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 336, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 387, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 589, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

34-21-13

.